Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 5

Spay/Neuter Law

44-17-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The Tennessee Spay/Neuter Law.”

Acts 2000, ch. 789, § 2.

44-17-502. Requirement for adoption.

No person shall adopt a dog or cat from an agency, including, but not limited to, an animal shelter, dog pound, animal control agency or humane shelter operated by a municipality, county, or other governmental agency within the state, or a private organization operating a shelter from which animals are adopted or reclaimed, unless:

The dog or cat has already been spayed or neutered;

The dog or cat has been spayed or neutered by a licensed veterinarian while in the custody of the agency; or

The new owner signs a written agreement with the agency stating that the new owner will have the dog or cat spayed or neutered by a licensed veterinarian:

Within thirty (30) days of the date of the adoption, if such dog or cat is sexually mature; or

Within thirty (30) days after the dog or cat reaches six (6) months of age, if the dog or cat is not sexually mature at the time of the adoption.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the spaying or neutering of a sexually immature dog or cat at the discretion of a licensed veterinarian with the consent of the new owner.

Acts 2000, ch. 789, § 3.

44-17-503. Deposit — Forfeiture of deposit — Use of forfeited deposits.

If the dog or cat being adopted has not been spayed or neutered, the agency shall require a deposit of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) from the new owner prior to the adoption in order to ensure that the dog or cat is spayed or neutered. The new owner may request and shall receive a refund of the deposit from the agency upon providing confirmation of the spaying or neutering.

If the new owner fails to have the dog or cat spayed or neutered within the time frame established by § 44-17-502, or if the spaying or neutering is timely performed, but the new owner fails to request the return of the deposit within an additional ten (10) days after the date by which the spaying or neutering is required to be performed, the deposit shall be forfeited to the agency holding the deposit and shall be used by the agency to conduct programs to spay or neuter dogs and cats in the community where the agency is located.

The forfeited deposit may also be used to defray operational expenses of the programs, including, but not limited to, costs for purchasing food, medications, tests, upgrades for the animal housing areas, or any other supplies or products which would improve the quality of life for dogs or cats in such programs.

No forfeited deposit may be used to pay salaries of persons employed by any agency located within the county.

Before the forfeited deposits may be used by an agency for the purposes set out in this subsection (b), the agency shall maintain a minimum balance in the forfeited deposit fund of no less than the total amount of unclaimed deposits collected during the previous six-month period.

Acts 2000, ch. 789, § 4; 2010, ch. 615, § 1; 2012, ch. 513, § 1; 2018, ch. 635, § 1.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “in the community where the agency is located” for “and/or to conduct educational programs in support of the spaying and neutering of dogs and cats” at the end of (b).

The 2012 amendment added the proviso to the end of (b).

The 2018 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “(b) If the new owner fails to have the dog or cat spayed or neutered within the time frame established by §44-17-502, or if the spaying or neutering is timely performed, but the new owner fails to request the return of the deposit within an additional ten (10) days after the date by which the spaying or neutering is required to be performed, the deposit shall be forfeited to the agency holding the deposit and shall be used by the agency to conduct programs to spay or neuter dogs and cats in the community where the agency is located; provided, that in any county having a population of not less than fifty-three thousand five hundred (53,500) nor more than fifty-three thousand six hundred (53,600), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the deposit shall be used to defray operational expenses of the programs, including, but not limited to, costs for purchasing food, medications, tests, upgrades for the animal housing areas, or any other supplies or products which would improve the quality of life for dogs or cats in such programs, and the deposit shall not be used to pay salaries of persons employed by any agency located within such county.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 615, § 2. March 2, 2010.

Acts 2012, ch. 513, § 2. February 7, 2012.

Acts 2018, ch. 635, § 2. July 1, 2018.

44-17-504. Petition for compliance.

If a person fails to comply with this part, the agency may file a petition with a court of competent jurisdiction seeking compliance and/or requesting return of the dog or cat to the agency from which it was adopted.

Acts 2000, ch. 789, § 5.

44-17-505. Dogs or cats claimed by owner.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize an agency to spay or neuter a dog or cat, if the dog or cat is being claimed by and returned to its lawful owner within seven (7) days of the dog or cat being taken into custody by the agency.

Acts 2000, ch. 789, § 6.